Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.920

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 295.

This 1977 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect October 1, 1977.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 25.]